Hawaii statutes.
[Rule 409.5] Admissibility of expressions
of sympathy and condolence. Evidence of statements or gestures that
express sympathy, commiseration, or condolence concerning the consequences of
an event in which the declarant was a participant is not admissible to prove
liability for any claim growing out of the event. This rule does not require
the exclusion of an apology or other statement that acknowledges or implies
fault even though contained in, or part of, any statement or gesture excludable
under this rule. [L 2007, c 88, §1]

RULE 409.5 COMMENTARY

This rule, shielding expressions of "sympathy,
commiseration, or condolence", resembles measures recently adopted in
several sister states. See, e.g., CA Evid. Code §1160, excluding expressions
of "sympathy or a general sense of benevolence". The rule favors
expressions of sympathy as embodying desirable social interactions and
contributing to civil settlements, and the evidentiary exclusion recognizes
that the law should "facilitate or, at least, not hinder the possibility
of this healing ritual". Robbennolt, Apologies and Legal Settlement: An
Empirical Examination, 102 Mich. L. Rev. 460, 474 (2003). The Hawaii legislature also stated: "Your committee finds it appropriate to allow
individuals and entities to express sympathy and condolence without the
expression being used ... to establish civil liability". Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 1131, March 21, 2007.

Whether a challenged utterance amounts to an expression of
sympathy or an acknowledgment of fault will be entrusted to the sound discretion
of the trial court under Rule 104(a). In making this determination, the court
could consider factors such as the declarant's language, the declarant's
physical and emotional condition, and the context and circumstances in which
the utterance was made.

Case Notes

Although trial court erred in concluding that the
admissibility of petitioner's statement regarding having "made a big
mistake" was governed by this rule, and also erred by excluding the preceding
words "I'm so sorry", because those words explained the context of
the "mistake" comment, the error was harmless beyond a reasonable
doubt in light of petitioner's testimony explaining the statement, and the
statement was relevant and admissible as a party admission under rule
803(a)(1). 126 H. 460, 272 P.3d 1227 (2012).

This rule, which provides that evidence "expressing
sympathy, commiseration, or condolences concerning the consequences of an event
in which the declarant was a participant is not admissible to prove liability
for any claim", applies in civil but not criminal cases; thus the circuit
court and appellate court erred in applying this rule in this criminal case.
126 H. 460, 272 P.3d 1227 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next